span.twol
Alphabet

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N Ñ O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Á É Í Ó Ú 
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n ñ o p q r s t u v w x y z á é í ó ú 

%> 

;

Rules

"Surface [z] should become [ce] before s"
z:ce <=> _ %> s: ;

"Surface [c] should become [qu] before i"
c:qu <=> _ %> i: ;

"Surface [z] should become [c] before [i]"
z:c <=> _ %> i: ;
